California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.283.

Failing any designation of the law under Section 1297.282 by the parties, the arbitral tribunal shall apply the rules of law it considers to be appropriate given all the circumstances surrounding the dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.284.

The arbitral tribunal shall decide ex aequo et bono or as amiable compositeur, if the parties have expressly authorized it to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.285.

In all cases, the arbitral tribunal shall decide in accordance with the terms of the contract and shall take into account the usages of the trade applicable to the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Decisionmaking by Panel of Arbitrators [1297.291. - 1297.291.]

1297.291.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, in arbitral proceedings with more than one arbitrator, any decision of the arbitral tribunal shall be made by a majority of all of its members.

Notwithstanding this section, if authorized by the parties or all the members of the arbitral tribunal, questions of procedure may be decided by a presiding arbitrator.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Settlement [1297.301. - 1297.304.]

1297.301.

It is not incompatible with an arbitration agreement for an arbitral tribunal to encourage settlement of the dispute and, with the agreement of the parties, the arbitral tribunal may use mediation, conciliation, or other procedures at any time during the arbitral proceedings to encourage settlement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.302.

If, during arbitral proceedings, the parties settle the dispute, the arbitral tribunal shall terminate the proceedings and, if requested by the parties and not objected to by the arbitral tribunal, record the settlement in the form of an arbitral award on agreed terms.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.303.

An arbitral award on agreed terms shall be made in accordance with Article 4 (commencing with Section 1297.311) of this chapter and shall state that it is an arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.304.

An arbitral award on agreed terms has the same status and effect as any other arbitral award on the substance of the dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Form and Content of Arbitral Award [1297.311. - 1297.318.]

1297.311.

An arbitral award shall be made in writing and shall be signed by the members of the arbitral tribunal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.312.

For the purposes of Section 1297.311, in arbitral proceedings with more than one arbitrator, the signatures of the majority of all the members of the arbitral tribunal shall be sufficient so long as the reason for any omitted signature is stated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.313.

The arbitral award shall state the reasons upon which it is based, unless the parties have agreed that no reasons are to be given, or the award is an arbitral award on agreed terms under Article 3 (commencing with Section 1297.301) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.314.

The arbitral award shall state its date and the place of arbitration as determined in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 1297.201) of Chapter 5 and the award shall be deemed to have been made at that place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.315.

After the arbitral award is made, a signed copy shall be delivered to each party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.316.

The arbitral tribunal may, at any time during the arbitral proceedings, make an interim arbitral award on any matter with respect to which it may make a final arbitral award. The interim award may be enforced in the same manner as a final arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.317.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the arbitral tribunal may award interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.318.

(a) Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, the costs of an arbitration shall be at the discretion of the arbitral tribunal.

(b) In making an order for costs, the arbitral tribunal may include as costs any of the following:

(1) The fees and expenses of the arbitrators and expert witnesses.

(2) Legal fees and expenses.

(3) Any administration fees
of the institution supervising the arbitration, if any.

(4) Any other expenses incurred in connection with the arbitral proceedings. 

(c) In making an order for costs, the arbitral tribunal may specify any of the following:

(1) The party entitled to costs.

(2) The party who shall pay the costs.

(3) The amount of costs or method of determining that amount.

(4) The manner in which the costs shall be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Termination of Proceedings [1297.321. - 1297.323.]

1297.321.

The arbitral proceedings are terminated by the final arbitral award or by an order of the arbitral tribunal under Section 1297.322. The award shall be final upon the expiration of the applicable periods in Article 6 (commencing with Section 1297.331) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.322.

The arbitral tribunal shall issue an order for the termination of the arbitral proceedings where any of the following occurs:

(a) The claimant withdraws his or her claim, unless the respondent objects to the order and the arbitral tribunal recognizes a legitimate interest on the respondent’s part in obtaining a final settlement of the dispute.

(b) The parties agree on the termination of the proceedings.

(c) The arbitral tribunal
finds that the continuation of the proceedings has for any other reason become unnecessary or impossible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.323.

Subject to Article 6 (commencing with Section 1297.331) of this chapter, the mandate of the arbitral tribunal terminates with the termination of the arbitral proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Correction and Interpretation of Awards and Additional Awards [1297.331. - 1297.337.]

1297.331.

Within 30 days after receipt of the arbitral award, unless another period of time has been agreed upon by the parties:

(a) A party may request the arbitral tribunal to correct in the arbitral award any computation errors, any clerical or typographical errors, or any other errors of a similar nature.

(b) A party may, if agreed by the parties, request the arbitral tribunal to give an interpretation of a specific point or part of the arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.332.

If the arbitral tribunal considers any request made under Section 1297.331 to be justified, it shall make the correction or give the interpretation within 30 days after receipt of the request and the interpretation shall form part of the arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.333.

The arbitral tribunal may correct any error of the type referred to in subdivision (a) of Section 1297.331, on its own initiative, within 30 days after the date of the arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.334.

Unless otherwise agreed by the parties, a party may request, within 30 days after receipt of the arbitral award, the arbitral tribunal to make an additional arbitral award as to the claims presented in the arbitral proceedings but omitted from the arbitral award.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.335.

If the arbitral tribunal considers any request made under Section 1297.334 to be justified, it shall make the additional arbitral award within 60 days after receipt of the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.336.

The arbitral tribunal may extend, if necessary, the period of time within which it shall make a correction, give an interpretation, or make an additional arbitral award under Section 1297.331 or 1297.334.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.337.

Article 4 (commencing with Section 1297.311) of this chapter applies to a correction or interpretation of the arbitral award or to an additional arbitral award made under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Conciliation [1297.341. - 1297.432.]



  ARTICLE 1. Appointment of Conciliators [1297.341. - 1297.343.]

1297.341.

It is the policy of the State of California to encourage parties to an international commercial agreement or transaction which qualifies for arbitration or conciliation pursuant to Section 1297.13, to resolve disputes arising from such agreements or transactions through conciliation. The parties may select or permit an arbitral tribunal or other third party to select one or more persons to serve as the conciliator or conciliators who shall assist the parties in an independent and impartial manner in their attempt to reach an amicable settlement of their dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.342.

The conciliator or conciliators shall be guided by principles of objectivity, fairness, and justice, giving consideration to, among other things, the rights and obligations of the parties, the usages of the trade concerned and the circumstances surrounding the dispute, including any previous practices between the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.343.

The conciliator or conciliators may conduct the conciliation proceedings in such a manner as they consider appropriate, taking into account the circumstances of the case, the wishes of the parties, and the desirability of a speedy settlement of the dispute. Except as otherwise provided in this title, other provisions of this code, the Evidence Code, or the California Rules of Court, shall not apply to conciliation proceedings brought under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Representation and Assistance [1297.351. - 1297.351.]

1297.351.

The parties may appear in person or be represented or assisted by any person of their choice. A person assisting or representing a party need not be a member of the legal profession or licensed to practice law in California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Report of Conciliators [1297.361. - 1297.362.]

1297.361.

At any time during the proceedings, the conciliator or conciliators may prepare a draft conciliation settlement which may include the assessment and apportionment of costs between the parties, and send copies to the parties, specifying the time within which they must signify their approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.362.

No party may be required to accept any settlement proposed by the conciliator or conciliators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Confidentiality [1297.371. - 1297.371.]

1297.371.

When persons agree to participate in conciliation under this title:

(a) Evidence of anything said or of any admission made in the course of the conciliation is not admissible in evidence, and disclosure of any such evidence shall not be compelled, in any civil action in which, pursuant to law, testimony may be compelled to be given. However, this subdivision does not limit the admissibility of evidence if all parties participating in conciliation consent to its disclosure.

(b) In the event that
any such evidence is offered in contravention of this section, the arbitration tribunal or the court shall make any order which it considers to be appropriate to deal with the matter, including, without limitation, orders restricting the introduction of evidence, or dismissing the case without prejudice.

(c) Unless the document otherwise provides, no document prepared for the purpose of, or in the course of, or pursuant to, the conciliation, or any copy thereof, is admissible in evidence, and disclosure of any such document shall not be compelled, in any arbitration or civil action in which, pursuant to law, testimony may be compelled to be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Stay of Arbitration and Resort to Other Proceedings [1297.381. - 1297.382.]

1297.381.

The agreement of the parties to submit a dispute to conciliation shall be deemed an agreement between or among those parties to stay all judicial or arbitral proceedings from the commencement of conciliation until the termination of conciliation proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.382.

All applicable limitation periods including periods of prescription shall be tolled or extended upon the commencement of conciliation proceedings to conciliate a dispute under this title and all limitation periods shall remain tolled and periods of prescription extended as to all parties to the conciliation proceedings until the 10th day following the termination of conciliation proceedings. For purposes of this article, conciliation proceedings are deemed to have commenced as soon as (a) a party has requested conciliation of a particular dispute or disputes, and (b) the other party or parties agree to participate in the
conciliation proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Termination [1297.391. - 1297.394.]

1297.391.

The conciliation proceedings may be terminated as to all parties by any of the following:

(a) A written declaration of the conciliator or conciliators, after consultation with the parties, to the effect that further efforts at conciliation are no longer justified, on the date of the declaration.

(b) A written declaration of the parties addressed to the conciliator or conciliators to the effect that the conciliation proceedings are terminated, on the date of the declaration.

(c) The signing of a settlement agreement by all of the parties, on the date of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.392.

The conciliation proceedings may be terminated as to particular parties by either of the following:

(a) A written declaration of a party to the other party and the conciliator or conciliators, if appointed, to the effect that the conciliation proceedings shall be terminated as to that particular party, on the date of the declaration.

(b) The signing of a settlement agreement by some of the parties, on the date of the agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.393.

No person who has served as conciliator may be appointed as an arbitrator for, or take part in any arbitral or judicial proceedings in, the same dispute unless all parties manifest their consent to such participation or the rules adopted for conciliation or arbitration otherwise provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.394.

By submitting to conciliation, no party shall be deemed to have waived any rights or remedies which that party would have had if conciliation had not been initiated, other than those set forth in any settlement agreement which results from the conciliation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Enforceability of Decree [1297.401. - 1297.401.]

1297.401.

If the conciliation succeeds in settling the dispute, and the result of the conciliation is reduced to writing and signed by the conciliator or conciliators and the parties or their representatives, the written agreement shall be treated as an arbitral award rendered by an arbitral tribunal duly constituted in and pursuant to the laws of this state, and shall have the same force and effect as a final award in arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Costs [1297.411. - 1297.412.]

1297.411.

Upon termination of the conciliation proceedings, the conciliator shall fix the costs of the conciliation and give written notice thereof to the parties. As used in this article, “costs” includes only the following:

(a) A reasonable fee to be paid to the conciliator or conciliators.

(b) The travel and other reasonable expenses of the conciliator or conciliators.

(c) The travel and other reasonable expenses of witnesses requested by
the conciliator or conciliators with the consent of the parties.

(d) The cost of any expert advice requested by the conciliator or conciliators with the consent of the parties.

(e) The cost of any court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.412.

These costs shall be borne equally by the parties unless the settlement agreement provides for a different apportionment. All other expenses incurred by a party shall be borne by that party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Effect on Jurisdiction [1297.421. - 1297.421.]

1297.421.

Neither the request for conciliation, the consent to participate in the conciliation proceedings, the participation in such proceedings, nor the entering into a conciliation agreement or settlement shall be deemed as consent to the jurisdiction of any court in this state in the event conciliation fails.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Immunity of Conciliators and Parties [1297.431. - 1297.432.]

1297.431.

Neither the conciliator or conciliators, the parties, nor their representatives shall be subject to service of process on any civil matter while they are present in this state for the purpose of arranging for or participating in conciliation pursuant to this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

1297.432.

No person who serves as a conciliator shall be held liable in an action for damages resulting from any act or omission in the performance of his or her role as a conciliator in any proceeding subject to this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   Effective March 7, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9.4. REAL ESTATE CONTRACT ARBITRATION [1298. - 1298.8.]

1298.

(a) Whenever any contract to convey real property, or contemplated to convey real property in the future, including marketing contracts, deposit receipts, real property sales contracts as defined in Section 2985 of the Civil Code, leases together with options to purchase, or ground leases coupled with improvements, but not including powers of sale contained in deeds of trust or mortgages, contains a provision for binding arbitration of any dispute between the principals in the transaction, the contract shall have that provision clearly titled “ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES.”

If a provision for binding arbitration is included in a printed contract, it shall be set out in at least 8-point bold type or in contrasting red in at least 8-point type, and if the
 provision is included in a typed contract, it shall be set out in capital letters.

(b) Whenever any contract or agreement between principals and agents in real property sales transactions, including, but not limited to, listing agreements, as defined in Section 1086 of the Civil Code, and buyer-broker representation agreements, as defined in Section 2079.13 of the Civil Code, contains a provision requiring binding arbitration of any dispute between the principals and agents in the transaction, the contract or agreement shall have that provision clearly titled “ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES.”

If a provision for binding arbitration is included in a printed contract, it shall be set out in at least 8-point bold type or in contrasting red in at least 8-point type, and if the provision is included in a typed contract, it shall be set out in capital letters.

(c) Immediately before the line or space provided for the parties to indicate their assent or nonassent to the arbitration provision described in subdivision (a) or (b), and immediately following that arbitration provision, the following shall appear:

“NOTICE: BY INITIALLING IN THE SPACE BELOW YOU ARE AGREEING TO HAVE ANY DISPUTE ARISING OUT OF THE MATTERS INCLUDED IN THE ‛ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES’ PROVISION DECIDED BY NEUTRAL ARBITRATION AS PROVIDED BY CALIFORNIA LAW AND YOU ARE GIVING UP ANY RIGHTS YOU MIGHT POSSESS TO HAVE THE DISPUTE LITIGATED IN A COURT OR JURY TRIAL. BY INITIALLING IN THE SPACE BELOW YOU ARE GIVING UP YOUR JUDICIAL RIGHTS TO DISCOVERY AND APPEAL, UNLESS THOSE RIGHTS ARE SPECIFICALLY INCLUDED IN THE ‛ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES’ PROVISION. IF YOU REFUSE TO SUBMIT TO ARBITRATION AFTER AGREEING TO THIS PROVISION, YOU MAY BE COMPELLED TO ARBITRATE UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE CALIFORNIA CODE OF CIVIL PROCEDURE.
 YOUR AGREEMENT TO THIS ARBITRATION PROVISION IS VOLUNTARY.”

“WE HAVE READ AND UNDERSTAND THE FOREGOING AND AGREE TO SUBMIT DISPUTES ARISING OUT OF THE MATTERS INCLUDED IN THE ‛ARBITRATION OF DISPUTES’ PROVISION TO NEUTRAL ARBITRATION.” 

If the above provision is included in a printed contract, it shall be set out either in at least 10-point bold type or in contrasting red print in at least 8-point bold type, and if the provision is included in a typed contract, it shall be set out in capital letters.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the authority of any court of competent jurisdiction with respect to real property transactions in areas involving court supervision or jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, probate, marital dissolution, foreclosure of liens, unlawful detainer, or eminent domain.

(e) In the event an arbitration provision is contained in an escrow instruction, it shall not preclude the right of an escrowholder to institute an interpleader action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 516, Sec. 6.   (AB 2992)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1298.5.

Any party to an action who proceeds to record a notice of pending action pursuant to Section 409 shall not thereby waive any right of arbitration which that person may have pursuant to a written agreement to arbitrate, nor any right to petition the court to compel arbitration pursuant to Section 1281.2, if, in filing an action to record that notice, the party at the same time presents to the court an application that the action be stayed pending the arbitration of any dispute which is claimed to be arbitrable and which is relevant to the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1989, by Section 1298.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1298.7.

In the event an arbitration provision is included in a contract or agreement covered by this title, it shall not preclude or limit any right of action for bodily injury or wrongful death, or any right of action to which Section 337.1 or 337.15 is applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1989, by Section 1298.8.)
-------------------------------------------

1298.8.

This title shall become operative on July 1, 1989, and shall only apply to contracts or agreements entered into on or after that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 881, Sec. 1.   Note: This section delayed the initial operation of Title 9.3 (now numbered 9.4), commencing with Section 1298.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9.5. ARBITRATION OF FIREFIGHTER AND LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER LABOR DISPUTES [1299. - 1299.9.]

1299.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that strikes taken by firefighters and law enforcement officers against public employers are a matter of statewide concern, are a predictable consequence of labor strife and poor morale that is often the outgrowth of substandard wages and benefits, and are not in the public interest. The Legislature further finds and declares that the dispute resolution procedures contained in this title provide the appropriate method for resolving public sector labor disputes that could otherwise lead to strikes by firefighters or law
 enforcement officers.

It is the intent of the Legislature to protect the health and welfare of the public by providing impasse remedies necessary to afford public employers the opportunity to safely alleviate the effects of labor strife that would otherwise lead to strikes by firefighters and law enforcement officers. It is further the intent of the Legislature that, in order to effectuate its predominant purpose, this title be construed to apply broadly to all public employers, including, but not limited to, charter cities, counties, and cities and counties in this state.

It is not the intent of the Legislature to alter the scope of issues subject to collective bargaining between public employers and employee organizations representing firefighters or law enforcement officers.

The provisions of this title are intended by the Legislature to govern the resolution of impasses reached
 in collective bargaining between public employers and employee organizations representing firefighters and law enforcement officers over economic issues that remain in dispute over their respective interests. However, the provisions of this title are not intended by the Legislature to be used as a procedure to determine the rights of any firefighter or law enforcement officer in any grievance initiated as a result of a disciplinary action taken by any public employer. The Legislature further intends that this title shall not apply to any law enforcement policy that pertains to how law enforcement officers interact with members of the public or pertains to police-community relations, such as policies on the use of police powers, enforcement priorities and practices, or supervision, oversight, and accountability covering officer behavior toward members of the public, to any community-oriented policing policy or to any process employed by an employer to investigate firefighter or law enforcement officer
 behavior that could lead to discipline against any firefighter or law enforcement officer, nor to contravene any provision of a charter that governs an employer that is a city, county, or city and county, which provision prescribes a procedure for the imposition of any disciplinary action taken against a firefighter or law enforcement officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.2.

This title shall apply to all employers of firefighters and law enforcement officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.3.

As used in this title:

(a) “Employee” means any firefighter or law enforcement officer represented by an employee organization, as defined in subdivision (b).

(b) “Employee organization” means any organization recognized by the employer for the purpose of representing firefighters or law enforcement officers in matters relating to wages, hours, and other terms and conditions of employment within the scope of arbitration.

(c) “Employer” means any local agency employing employees, as defined in subdivision (a), or any entity, except the State of California, acting as an agent of any local agency, either directly or indirectly.

(d) “Firefighter” means any person who is employed to perform firefighting, fire prevention, fire training, hazardous materials response, emergency medical services, fire or arson investigation, or any related duties, without respect to the rank, job title, or job assignment of that person.

(e) “Law enforcement officer” means any person who is a peace officer, as defined in Section 830.1 of, subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 830.31 of, subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of Section 830.32 of, subdivisions (a), (b), and (d) of Section 830.33 of, subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 830.35 of, subdivision (a) of Section
 830.5 of, and subdivision (a) of Section 830.55 of, the Penal Code, without respect to the rank, job title, or job assignment of that person.

(f) “Local agency” means any governmental subdivision, district, public and quasi-public corporation, joint powers agency, public agency or public service corporation, town, city, county, city and county, or municipal corporation, whether incorporated or not or whether chartered or not.

(g) “Scope of arbitration” means economic issues, including salaries, wages and overtime pay, health and pension benefits, vacation and other leave, reimbursements, incentives, differentials, and all other forms of remuneration. The scope of arbitration shall not include any issue that is protected by what is commonly referred to as the “management rights” clause contained in Section 3504 of the Government Code. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any employer
 that is not exempt under Section 1299.9 may supersede this subdivision by adoption of an ordinance that establishes a broader definition of “scope of arbitration.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.4.

(a) If an impasse has been declared after the parties have exhausted their mutual efforts to reach agreement over matters within the scope of arbitration, and the parties are unable to agree to the appointment of a mediator, or if a mediator agreed to by the parties is unable to effect settlement of a dispute between the parties after his or her appointment, the employee organization may, by written notification to the employer, request that their differences be submitted to an arbitration panel.

(b) Within three days after receipt of the written notification, each party shall designate a person to serve as its member of an arbitration panel. Within five days thereafter, or within additional periods to which they mutually agree, the two members of the arbitration panel appointed by the parties shall designate an impartial person with experience in labor and management dispute resolution to act as chairperson of the arbitration panel.

(c) In the event that the parties are unable or unwilling to agree upon a third person to serve as chairperson, the two members of the arbitration panel shall jointly request from the American Arbitration Association a list of seven impartial and experienced persons who are familiar with matters of employer-employee relations. The two panel members may as an alternative, jointly request a list of seven names from the California State Mediation and
 Conciliation Service, or a list from either entity containing more or less than seven names, so long as the number requested is an odd number. If after five days of receipt of the list, the two panel members cannot agree on which of the listed persons shall serve as chairperson, they shall, within two days, alternately strike names from the list, with the first panel member to strike names being determined by lot. The last person whose name remains on the list shall be chairperson.

(d) Employees as defined by this chapter shall not be permitted to engage in strikes that endanger public safety.

(e) No employer shall interfere with, intimidate, restrain, coerce, or discriminate against an employee organization or employee because of an exercise of rights under this title.

(f) No employer shall refuse to meet and confer
 or condition agreement upon a memorandum of understanding based upon an employee organization’s exercise of rights under this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.5.

(a) The arbitration panel shall, within 10 days after its establishment or any additional periods to which the parties agree, meet with the parties or their representatives, either jointly or separately, make inquiries and investigations, hold hearings, and take any other action including further mediation, that the arbitration panel deems appropriate.

(b) For the purpose of its hearings, investigations, or inquiries, the arbitration panel may subpoena witnesses, administer
 oaths, take the testimony of any person, and issue subpoenas duces tecum to require the production and examination of any employer’s or employee organization’s records, books, or papers relating to any subject matter before the panel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.6.

(a) The arbitration panel shall direct that five days prior to the commencement of its hearings, each of the parties shall submit the last best offer of settlement as to each of the issues within the scope of arbitration, as defined in this title, made in bargaining as a proposal or counterproposal and not previously agreed to by the parties prior to any arbitration request made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1299.4. The arbitration panel, within 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing, or any additional period to which the
 parties agree, shall separately decide on each of the disputed issues submitted by selecting, without modification, the last best offer that most nearly complies with the applicable factors described in subdivision (c). This subdivision shall be applicable except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b).

(b) Notwithstanding the terms of subdivision (a), the parties by mutual agreement may elect to submit as a package the last best offer of settlement made in bargaining as a proposal or counterproposal on those issues within the scope of arbitration, as defined in this title, not previously agreed to by the parties prior to any arbitration request made pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1299.4. The arbitration panel, within 30 days after the conclusion of the hearing, or any additional period to which the parties agree, shall decide on the disputed issues submitted by selecting, without modification, the last best offer package that most
 nearly complies with the applicable factors described in subdivision (c). 

(c) The arbitration panel, unless otherwise agreed to by the parties, shall limit its findings to issues within the scope of arbitration and shall base its findings, opinions, and decisions upon those factors traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of those matters within the scope of arbitration, including but not limited to the following factors, as applicable:

(1) The stipulations of the parties.

(2) The interest and welfare of the public.

(3) The financial condition of the employer and its ability to meet the costs of the award.

(4) The availability and sources of funds to defray the cost of
 any changes in matters within the scope of arbitration.

(5) Comparison of matters within the scope of arbitration of other employees performing similar services in corresponding fire or law enforcement employment.

(6) The average consumer prices for goods and services, commonly known as the Consumer Price Index.

(7) The peculiarity of requirements of employment, including, but not limited to, mental, physical, and educational qualifications; job training and skills; and hazards of employment.

(8) Changes in any of the foregoing that are traditionally taken into consideration in the determination of matters within the scope of arbitration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 906, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.7.

(a) The arbitration panel shall mail or otherwise deliver a copy of the decision to the parties. However, the decision of the arbitration panel shall not be publicly disclosed, and shall not be binding, for a period of five days after service to the parties. During that five-day period, the parties may meet privately, attempt to resolve their differences and, by mutual agreement, amend or modify the decision of the arbitration panel.

(b) At the conclusion of the five-day
 period, which may be extended by the parties, the arbitration panel’s decision, as may be amended or modified by the parties pursuant to subdivision (a), shall be publicly disclosed and, unless the governing body acts in accordance with subdivision (c), shall be binding on all parties, and, if specified by the arbitration panel, be incorporated into and made a part of any existing memorandum of understanding as defined in Section 3505.1 of the Government Code.

(c) The employer may by unanimous vote of all the members of the governing body reject the decision of the arbitration panel, except as specifically provided to the contrary in a city, county, or city and county charter with respect to the rejection of an arbitration award.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 877, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1299.8.
